Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-2612
Consumer reporting agency; information furnished to governmental agency.

The Credit Report Protection Act does not prohibit a consumer reporting agency from furnishing to a governmental agency a consumer's name, address, former address, place of employment, or former place of employment.

Laws 2007, LB674, § 12.